hu_HU.aff
SFX l   0    sebbek       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    sebbe        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    sebb         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    sbõl         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    sben         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    sbe          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    s            [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    nyiül        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiül        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiért       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiért       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyitõl       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyitõl       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyit         [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyit         [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyirõl       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyirõl       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyire        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyire        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyinél       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyinél       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyinek       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyinek       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiig        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiig        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyihez       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyihez       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyibõl       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyibõl       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiben       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiben       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyibe        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyibe        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyi          [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyi          [^ey]
SFX l   0    leg          i
SFX l   0    jûül         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûért        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûvé         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûvé         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûvel        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûvel        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûtõl        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûrõl        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûre         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûnél        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûnek        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûként       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûig         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûhez        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûet         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûen         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekül       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekért      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûektõl      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekrõl      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekre       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûeknél      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûeknek      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekké       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekkel      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekig       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekhez      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûeket       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûeken       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekbõl      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekben      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûekbe       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûek         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûbõl        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûben        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jûbe         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    jû           [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX l   0    iöl          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iéöl         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iéért        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iévü         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iével        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iétel        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iét          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iért         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iérel        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iére         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iénül        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iének        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ién          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iéig         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iéhéz        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iében        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iébel        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iébe         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ié           [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ivü          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ivel         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    itel         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    it           [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    irel         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ire          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    inül         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    inek         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    in           [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ileg         [^i]
SFX l   0    iként        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ikor         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iig          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ihéz         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    iben         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ibel         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    ibe          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    i            [^i]
SFX l   0    i            [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esül         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esért        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    estõl        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    essé         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    essel        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esrõl        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esre         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esnél        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esnek        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esként       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esig         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    eshez        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    eset         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esen         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekül       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekért      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esektõl      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekrõl      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekre       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    eseknél      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    eseknek      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekké       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekkel      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekig       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekhez      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    eseket       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekbõl      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekben      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esekbe       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esek         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbõl      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbért     [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbé       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbtõl     [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbrõl     [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbre      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbnél     [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbnek     [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbként    [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbig      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbhez     [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbet      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebben      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebben      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbel      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekül    [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekért   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbektõl   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekrõl   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekre    [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbeknél   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbeknek   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekig    [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekhez   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbeket    [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekbõl   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekben   [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbekbe    [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbek      [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebbe       [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esebb        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esbõl        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esben        [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    esbe         [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    es           [^aeiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX l   0    elen         tt
