hu_HU.dic
ütlegelhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
üléseztetés/BVLlTYcXD
ügyeletes/BVLlTYcD
újságcikk/BVLylTYcD
összkép/BVLlRYcD
összeegyeztethetetlenség/BVLlTYc
ördögiség/BVLlTYc
önfertõztetés/BVLlTYcXD
ölelgethetõség/BVLlTYcXD
õszíthetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
órazseb/BVLylTYcD
írásbelizés/BVLlTYcXD
észrevevõdhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
érzelmeskedés/BVLlTYcXD
értesülhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
érettség/BVLlTYc
építés/BVLlTYcXD
éltethetetlenség/BVLlTYcD
éldegélés/BVLlTYcXD
éheztethetõség/BVLlTYcXD
átütéses/BVLlTYcD
átkerekeztetés/BVLlTYcXD
árcsökkenés/BVLlTYcD
züllesztetés/BVLlTYcXD
zöldellõség/BVLlTYc
zsizsik/BVLlRYcD
zerge/BVLRlYcD
vörheny/BVLlTYcD
vétkellhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
véreb/BVLylTYcD
végkielégítés/BVLylTYcD
vázszerkezet/BVLylTYcD
vitrin/BVLlRYcD
viseltesség/BVLlTYc
viaszfehér/BVLlRYcD
vetkõzhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
vesszõütés/BVLylTYcD
veretés/BVLlTYcXD
vegyíthetõség/BVLlTYcXD
vakszik/BVLlRYcD
tüzesíttetés/BVLlTYcXD
tükröztetés/BVLlTYcXD
túlmenõség/BVLlTYc
törvényszékiség/BVLlTYc
töredelmesség/BVLlTYc
töményíthetõség/BVLlTYcXD
tökéletesedés/BVLlTYcXD
tízszerezhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
térdepeltetés/BVLlTYcXD
társaságkedvelõség/BVLlTYc
tridimit/BVLlRYcD
tisztelés/BVLlTYcXD
tetvezhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
testesíthetõség/BVLlTYcXD
termõföld/BVLNylRYcD
terjedezés/BVLlTYcXD
tenyészés/BVLlTYcXD
teltség/BVLlTYc
tekintélyes/BVLlTYcDBDGVLT
tehetetlenség/BVLlTYcXDBVLlTYc
süvöltés/BVLlTYcXD
süketülés/BVLlTYcXD
sörét/BVLlRYcD
sértegethetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
szülhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
szövétnek/BVLlRYcD
szörny/BVLNlTYcD
szõkíthetõség/BVLlTYcXD
színlegesség/BVLlTYc
szélkelep/BVLlRYcD
szédültetés/BVLlTYcXD
szálkaperje/BVLRlYcD
szkafander/BVLlRYcD
szeszesedhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
szerfölöttiség/BVLlTYc
szeplõsítés/BVLlTYcXD
szennyezettség/BVLlTYcD
szemlélõdés/BVLlTYcXDBVLlTYcD
szembekötõsdi/BVLRlYcD
szelemenes/BVLlTYcD
szegeltetés/BVLlTYcXD
szakmánybér/BVLlRYcD
stiches/BVLlTYcD
spicli/BVLRlYcD
slisszelhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
siettethetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
senyvesztés/BVLlTYcXD
sejtethetõség/BVLlTYcXD
sebesítetlenség/BVLlTYc
röptézés/BVLlTYcXD
rózsaszínûség/BVLlTYc
részeltetés/BVLlTYcXD
régies/BVLlTYcDBDGVLT
rosszlelkûség/BVLlTYcD
rezgõség/BVLlTYc
reszteltettetés/BVLlTYcXD
rengés/BVLlTYcXD
rendelkezhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
rejtjelezhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
recseghetõség/BVLlTYcXD
pötyögés/BVLlTYcXD
pökdösés/BVLlTYcXD
pénzrendszer/BVLylTYcD
pufferelés/BVLlTYcXD
precízség/BVLlTYc
plakett/AUBVKLklQRYcD
pingelés/BVLlTYcXD
pezsgõsüveg/BVLylRTYcD
permet/BVLlRYcD
pengettetés/BVLlTYcXD
pecsételhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
pallér/BVLlRYcD
oldalfény/BVLylTYcD
nõztetés/BVLlTYcXD
népnyelv/BVLylTYcD
nyüzsöghetõség/BVLlTYcXD
nyilaskeresztes/BVLlTYcD
nyekergetés/BVLlTYcXD
nevettethetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
nemezeltetés/BVLlTYcXD
negyedik/VLlTaBVLlTYcD
nagyvezér/BVLlRYcD
mûvelõdés/BVLlTYcXDBVLlTYcD
mételyezhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
méretés/BVLlTYcXD
méhike/BVLRlYcD
moped/BVLlRYcD
mimózalelkûség/BVLlTYc
meszesedés/BVLlTYcXD
meresztethetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
menhelye/BVLRlYcD
mellékelhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
megélés/BVLlTYcD
megszûnte/BVLRlYcD
megmérgezés/BVLlTYcD
megismétlés/BVLlTYcD
megengedés/BVLlTYcD
masni/BVLRlYcD
magasszintûség/BVLlTYc
löttyentetés/BVLlTYcXD
lételméletiség/BVLlTYc
légzhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
lábfej/BVLylTYcD
licencelés/BVLlTYcXD
levelesség/BVLlTYc
leppegés/BVLlTYcXD
lemezelhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
lejtõsödés/BVLlTYcXD
legközelebbiség/BVLlTYc
lecikiztetés/BVLlTYcXD
küszködés/BVLlTYcXD
kübli/BVLRlYcD
közlés/BVLlTYcDBVLTXY
következtetettség/BVLlTYc
körítés/BVLlTYcXD
könnye/BVLRlYcD
kísérelhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
készségesség/BVLlTYc
képviselhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
kéjelegés/BVLlTYcXD
korvett/BVLlRYcD
kiüregezhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
kisemmizettség/BVLlTYc
kiherélés/BVLlTYcD
kibulizhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
kerülgetés/BVLlTYcXD
kenyerezés/BVLlTYcXD
kekeckedhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
kapucíner/BVLlRYcD
jogszerûség/BVLlTYc
jegelhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
internet/BVLlRYcD
ihlethetõség/BVLlTYcXD
hüppögés/BVLlTYcXD
hízelgõség/BVLlTYc
hozzáférhetõség/BVLlTYc
hibrid/BVLlRYcD
hempergethetõség/BVLlTYcXD
havibér/BVLlRYcD
hajtószerkezet/BVLylTYcD
gömbölyíttetés/BVLlTYcXD
gyûrûsödhetõség/BVLlTYcXD
gyõzedelmesség/BVLlTYc
graciõzség/BVLlTYc
galibaszerzõség/BVLlTYc
fûttetés/BVLlTYcXD
földeltetés/BVLlTYcXD
fémmûvesség/BVLlTYcDBVLlTYc
frissesség/BVLlTYcD
figyelmesség/BVLlTYc
fenhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
fellegesedtetés/BVLlTYcXD
felejthetõség/BVLlTYcXD
fehérköpenyes/BVLlTYcD
ezüstözhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
esküdözés/BVLlTYcXD
ereszkedés/BVLlTYcXD
emésztetés/BVLlTYcXD
elõlegezés/BVLlTYcXD
elsötétítés/BVLlTYcD
ellenérv/BVLylTYcD
elfecserészés/BVLlTYcXD
együléses/BVLylTYcD
egyed/XVLlTaBVLlTYcD
dörgölõdés/BVLlTYcXD
díszesítés/BVLlTYcXD
diliztetés/BVLlTYcXD
cölöpözés/BVLlTYcXD
csörgõség/BVLlTYc
csontszínûség/BVLlTYc
cserélhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
csempézhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
cigi/BVLRlYcD
bömböltetés/BVLlTYcXD
bélyegeztetés/BVLlTYcXD
boltív/BVLylTYcD
betûzgettetés/BVLlTYcXD
belsõtõke/BVLRylYcD
befejezõdés/BVLlTYcD
attraktívség/BVLlTYc
alkotórész/BVLylTYcD
